Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-921
Public service activities, defined.

Public service activities shall mean those programs established to make available to the public the particular resources of a system, area, or institution for the purpose of responding to a statewide, regional, or community need. Within this category may be included the following activities: (1) Direct patient care; (2) health care supportive services; (3) community services; (4) cooperative agricultural extension; (5) public broadcasting services; (6) cultural, recreational, and personal development activities; (7) economic development activities; and (8) continuing education for occupations and professions. Adult, basic, and continuing education programs or services shall not be included in the subcategory of community services.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 5;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 89;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 10.